Utah statutes.
63A-1-109.   Divisions of department -- Administration.
(1)  The department shall be composed of the following divisions:
(a)  administrative rules;
(b)  archives and records;
(c)  facilities construction and management;
(d)  finance;
(e)  fleet operations;
(f)  office of state debt collection;
(g)  state purchasing and general services;
(h)  risk management; and
(i)  office of child welfare parental defense.
(2)  Each division shall be administered and managed by a division director.
